Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-513
Immunity from liability; when.

Any health care facility, provider agency, or agent, employee, administrator, physician, or other representative of such health care facility or provider agency who in good faith provides or fails to provide notification, testing, or other action as required by sections 71-507 to 71-513 shall have immunity from any liability, either criminal or civil, that might result by reason of such action or inaction.

Laws 1989, LB 157, § 7.